Utah statutes.
17-36-24.   Budget appropriation reduction.

The budget appropriation for any department may be reduced, for any purpose other than to transfer funds to another department, by resolution of the governing body provided that five days' notice of the proposed action is given to all members of the governing body and to the director of the department affected, and that such director is permitted to be heard on the proposed reduction. Notice may be waived in writing by the affected department or by any member of the governing body.

